src/phonology/moh-phon.xfscript
#this script contains variables used by all alternation rules
# it must be run before any of the rules

set flag-is-epsilon ON

define ppMarker %^PP%-%^; # marks the start of the personal prefix
define rootBM %^R%-%^; # root boundary marker

#define verbTypeFG "@U.VerbType."[{Red}|{Blue}|{Purple}]"@"; # captures flag diacritis marking verb type
define verbTypeFG "#"; # captures flag diacritis marking verb type

#conjugation classes of verbs
define ccClassFG "@" [P|R] ".CC." [{One}|{Two}|{Three}|{Four}|{Five}|{Six}|{Seven}|{Eight}|{Nine}] "@" ;


#define habAspect "@U.Aspect."{Habitual}"@";
#define commandAspect "@U.Aspect."{Command}"@";
#define punctAspect "@U.Aspect."{Punct}"@";
#define perfAspect "@U.Aspect."{Perf}"@";


define punctMarker %^P%^;
define perfMarker %^R%^;
define habMarker %^H%^;
define comMarker %^C%^;

define hiddenH %^hh%^;
define teMarker %^TE%^;
define niMarker %^NI%^;

define defPast %^Past%^;
define condMarker %^Cond%^;
define futMarker %^Fut%^;

define nasalVowel [ {on} | {en}];
define accVowel [á | à | é | è | í | ì | ó | ò | ú | ù | %:];
define vowel [ a | e | o | u | i | nasalVowel | accVowel]; 
define consonant [ h | k | n| r | s | t | w | y | {kw} | {ts} | {wh}];
define wordChar [vowel | consonant | %' | %`];



#Rules for replacing c-stem forms of active (RED) bound pronouns with the correct form (be it A, E, I or O)
#
#


#Agent I (ke)
define keCore  {ke}-> k || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a | e | i | o | h | y ] ; 

# agent you (se)
define seCore  {se} -> {s} || ppMarker _ rootBM [a | e | o] ,,
{se} -> {ts} || ppMarker _ rootBM [i] ,,
{se} -> {it} || ppMarker _ rootBM {hs};

define seExc {se} -> s || ppMarker _ rootBM [ h | y ] ;
define seExcPrefix {se}  -> {hse} || [?+ (verbverbTypeFG) ppMarker] _ rootBM,,
    s -> {hs} || [?+ (verbverbTypeFG) ppMarker] _ rootBM,,
    {ts} -> {hs} || [?+ (verbverbTypeFG) ppMarker] _ rootBM,,
    {it} -> {t} || [?+ (verbverbTypeFG) ppMarker] _ rootBM;
define sToSe [..] -> e || ppMarker s _ rootBM [ {khonni} ] ; 



# agent he (ra)
define raCore {ra} -> {r} || ppMarker _ rootBM [a | e | o] ,,
[ppMarker {ra} rootBM i] -> [ppMarker {ren} rootBM i];

define raExc r -> {hr} || [wordChar+ ppMarker] _ rootBM [e | o];

#agent she (ye)
define yeCore [ppMarker {ye} rootBM a] -> [ppMarker {yon} rootBM] ,,
[ppMarker {ye} rootBM i] -> [ppMarker {ye} rootBM] ,,
{ye} -> {yak} || ppMarker _ rootBM [e | o];

#agent it (ka)
define kaCore {ka} -> {w} || ppMarker _ rootBM [a | e ],,
[ppMarker {ka} rootBM i] -> [ppMarker {ken} rootBM],,
{ka} -> {y} || ppMarker _ rootBM [o];

# agent you and I (teni)
define teniCore {teni}-> {ty} || ppMarker _ rootBM [a ] ,,
{teni}-> {ten} || ppMarker _ rootBM [i | e | o];

# agent smb and I (yakeni)
define yakeniCore {yakeni}-> {yaken} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ i | e | o] ,,
{yakeni}-> {yaky} || ppMarker _ rootBM [a] ;

# agent you two (seni)
define seniCore {seni}-> {sen} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ i | e | o] ,,
{seni}-> {tsy} || ppMarker _ rootBM [a] ;

# agent 2 males (ni)
#define hniCore {hni}-> {hn} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ i | e | o] ,,
#{hni}-> {hy} || ppMarker _ rootBM [a] ;
#define hniExc h -> 0 || [ .#. (verbTypeFG) ppMarker] _ [n [i]^{0,1}] | y rootBM;

define hniCore {ni}-> {n} || ppMarker hiddenH _ rootBM [i | e | o],,
{ni}-> {y} || ppMarker hiddenH _ rootBM [a] ;

# agent 2 females (keni)
define keniCore  {keni}-> {ken} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ i | e | o] ,,
{keni}-> {ky} || ppMarker _ rootBM [a] ;

# agent you all and I (tewa)
define tewaCore {tewa}-> {tew} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a | e] ,,
[ppMarker {tewa} rootBM i ] -> [ppMarker {tewen} rootBM ],,
{tewa}-> {ty} || ppMarker _ rootBM [o] ;

# agent they and I (yakwa)
define yakwaCore {yakwa}-> {yakw} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a | e] ,,
[ppMarker {yakwa} rootBM i ] -> [ppMarker {yakwen} rootBM ],,
{yakwa}-> {yaky} || ppMarker _ rootBM [o] ;

# agent all of you (sewa)
define sewaCore {sewa}-> {sew} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a | e] ,,
[ppMarker {sewa} rootBM i ] -> [ppMarker {sewen} rootBM ],,
{sewa}-> {tsy} || ppMarker _ rootBM [o] ;

# agent they males/mixed (rati)
define ratiCore [ppMarker {rati} rootBM a] -> [ppMarker {ron} rootBM] ,,
{rati}-> {ronn} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ e | o] ,,
{rati}-> {rat} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ i ];

# agent they females (konti)
define kontiCore [ppMarker {konti} rootBM a] -> [ppMarker {kon} rootBM],,
{konti}-> {konn} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ e | o] ,,
{konti}-> {kont} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ i ];


define replaceLetter ? -> 0 || ppMarker [ {ren} | {yon} | {tewen} | {yakwen} | {sewen} | {ron} ] rootBM _ ;
define replaceLetterYe i -> 0 || ppMarker {ye} rootBM _ ;
define replaceLetterKen i -> 0 || ppMarker {kon} rootBM _ ;



define coreRed keCore .o. seCore .o. raCore .o. yeCore .o. teniCore .o. 
yakeniCore .o. seniCore .o. hniCore .o. keniCore .o. tewaCore .o. 
yakwaCore .o. sewaCore .o. ratiCore .o. kontiCore .o. kaCore;

define exceptRed  seExc .o. seExcPrefix .o. sToSe .o. raExc ;

define reWriteRed coreRed .o. exceptRed ;


#rules for replacing passive (blue) personal pronouns from their canonical c-verb forms into the one matching the following morpheme

#correspond to the tables on pages 3-6 of Unit 1

#Patient I (wake)
define wakeCore  {wake}-> {wak} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a | e | i | o ] ; 
define wakeExc {wake} -> {wak} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ h | y ] ; 

# Patient you (sa)
define saCore  {sa} -> {s} || ppMarker _ rootBM [a | e | o] ;
define saCoreI [ ppMarker {sa} rootBM i] ->  ppMarker {sen} rootBM;

# Patient he (ro)
define roAI [ ppMarker {ro} rootBM [a | i]] -> ppMarker {ro} rootBM;
define roE {ro} -> {raw} || ppMarker _ rootBM [e] ;
define roO {ro} -> {ra} || ppMarker _ rootBM [o] ;

# Patient she (yako)
define yakoAI [ ppMarker {yako} rootBM [a | i]] -> ppMarker {yako} rootBM;
define yakoE {yako} -> {yakaw} || ppMarker _ rootBM [e] ;
define yakoO {yako} -> {yaka} || ppMarker _ rootBM [o] ;

# Patient it (yo)
define yoAI [ ppMarker {yo} rootBM [a | i]] -> ppMarker {yo} rootBM;
define yoE {yo} -> {yaw} || ppMarker _ rootBM [e] ;
define yoO {yo} -> {ya} || ppMarker _ rootBM [o] ;

#Patient both of us (yonkeni)
define yonkeniCore  {yonkeni}-> {yonky} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a ] ,,
{yonkeni}-> {yonken} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ i | e | o ]; 

#patient plural (M + F)
define rotiCore {roti} -> {ron} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a | e | o ];
define rotiI {roti} -> {rot} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ i ];

#patient plural females
define yotiCore {yoti} -> {yon} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a | e | o ];
define yotiI {yoti} -> {yot} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ i ];

#patient all of us (they and I or you all and I), yonkwa
define yonkwaAE {yonkwa} -> {yonkw} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a | e  ];
define yonkwaO {yonkwa} -> {yonky} || ppMarker _ rootBM [o];
define yonkwaI [ ppMarker {yakwa} rootBM [i]] -> ppMarker {yonkwen} rootBM;


define removeRM  rootBM -> "^" ;
define removePP ppMarker -> "^";

define coreBlue wakeCore .o. saCore .o. saCoreI .o. roAI .o. roE .o. roO .o. yakoAI .o. yakoE .o. yakoO .o. yoAI .o. yoE .o. yoO .o. yonkeniCore .o. rotiCore .o. rotiI .o. yotiCore .o. yotiI .o. yonkwaAE .o. yonkwaO .o. yonkwaI;

define exceptBlue wakeExc ;

define reWriteBlue coreBlue .o. exceptBlue ;


#rules for replacing "transitive" (purple) personal pronouns from their canonical c-verb forms into the one matching the following morpheme

#correspond to the tables on pages 7-8 of Unit 1

# me->you (kon)
define konCore  {kon}-> {kony} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a | e | o ] ; 
define konI [ ppMarker {kon} rootBM [i]] -> ppMarker {kon} rootBM;

#me -> him (ri)
define riCore {ri}-> {riy} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a | e | o ] ; 
define riI {ri}-> {r} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ i ];

#me -> her/them (khe)
define kheCore  {khe}-> {khey} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a | e | o ] ; 
define kheI [ ppMarker {khe} rootBM [i]] -> ppMarker {khe} rootBM;

#me -> you two (keni)
# you 2 -> me (takeni)
define keniCore i -> 0 || ppMarker ({ta}) {ken} _ rootBM [ i | e | o ] ; 
define keniA {eni}-> {y} || ppMarker ({ta}) k _ rootBM [ a ];



#me -> you all; they & I -> you (kwa)
#you -> them and I; you all -> me (takwa)
#you all and I -> him (etshitewa)
#you all -> him (etshisewa)
#he -> us all (shonkwa)
#they and I -> him (shakwa)
define kwaPP [{kw} | {takw} | {etshitew} | {etshisew} | (hiddenH){shonkw} | (hiddenH){shakw}];
define kwaCore a -> 0 || ppMarker kwaPP _ rootBM [ a | e  ] ; 
define kwaI [{a} rootBM [i]] -> [ {en} rootBM ] || kwaPP _ ;
define kwaO  a -> y || ppMarker kwaPP _ rootBM [ o  ] ; 


#you -> me (take)
define takeCore {take}-> {tak} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ i | e | o | h | y] ; 
define takeA {take}-> {takw} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a ];

#you -> him (etshe)
define etsheCore {etshe}-> {etsh} || ppMarker _ rootBM [ a| i | e | o | h | y] ;




#you -> her, them (she)
define sheCore  {she}-> {shey} || ppMarker (hiddenH) _ rootBM [ a | e | o ] ; 
define sheI i -> 0 || ppMarker (hiddenH) {she} rootBM _ ;

#you and I -> him (etshiteni)
#he -> us 2 (shonkeni)
#smb and I -> him (shakeni)
define etshiteniCore i -> 0 || ppMarker  [ {etshiten}  | (hiddenH) {shonken} | (hiddenH) {shaken}] _ rootBM [  i | e | o ] ;
define etshiteniA {eni}-> {y} || ppMarker [{etshit} | (hiddenH){shonk} | (hiddenH){shak}] _ rootBM [  a ] ;

#you 2 -> him (etshiseni)
define etshiseniCore i -> 0 || ppMarker  {etshisen}  _ rootBM [  i | e | o ] ;
define etshiseniA {seni}-> {tsy} || ppMarker  {etshi}  _ rootBM [  a ] ;

#he -> me (rake), 
#they -> me (yonke)
define rakePP [{rak} | {yonk} ];
define rakeCore e -> 0 || ppMarker rakePP _ rootBM [ i | o | h | y  ] ; 
define rakeAI e -> w || ppMarker rakePP _ rootBM [ a | e  ] ; 

#he -> you (ya)
define yaCore  {ya}-> {yay} || ppMarker hiddenH _ rootBM [ e | o ] ; 
define yaA  {ya}-> {y} || ppMarker hiddenH _ rootBM [ a ] ; 
define yaI [hiddenH {ya} rootBM i] -> [ hiddenH {yen} rootBM ] ;

#he->he (ro) : covered in rules-BLUE

#he -> her, them (shako)
define shakoAI [a | i] -> 0 || ppMarker (hiddenH) {shako} rootBM _ ;
define shakoE  {shako}-> {shakaw} || ppMarker (hiddenH) _ rootBM [ e ] ; 
define shakoO  {shako}-> {shaka} || ppMarker (hiddenH) _ rootBM [ o ] ; 


#she, smb, they -> him (ronwa)
#she, smb, they -> her (konwa)
#she, smb, they -> you (yesa)
define ronwaPP [{ronw} | {konw} | {yes}];
define ronwaCore a -> 0 || ppMarker ronwaPP _ rootBM [ a | e  ] ; 
define ronwaI [{a} rootBM [i]] -> [ {en} rootBM ] || ronwaPP _ ;
define ronwaO  a -> {ay} || ppMarker ronwaPP _ rootBM [ o  ] ; 

#she or them -> she or them (yontate)
define yontateCore e -> 0 || ppMarker {yontat} _ rootBM [ a | i | e | o | h | y  ] ; 

#she or they -> them males (ronwati)
#she or they -> them females (konwati)
define ronwatiAO {ti} -> {n} || ppMarker [{ronwa} | {konwa} ] _ rootBM [ a | o ] ; 
define ronwatiEI {i} -> 0 || ppMarker [{ronwat} | {konwat} ] _ rootBM [ i | e ] ; 

# they males -> her (shakoti)
# they females -> her (yakoti)
define shakotiAO {ti} -> {n} || ppMarker [{yako} | [ (hiddenH) {shako}] ] _ rootBM [ a | o ] ; 
define shakotiEI {i} -> 0 || ppMarker [{yakot} | [ (hiddenH) {shakot}] ] _ rootBM [ i | e ] ; 




#you (all) and I  -> her or them (yethi)
#they -> you two (all) (yetshi)
#they (smb) and I  -> her or them (yakhi)
#they   -> you and I(yonkhi)
define yetPP [{yeth} | {yetsh} | {yakh} | {yonkh}];
define yetCore [..] -> y || ppMarker yetPP i _ rootBM [ a | e  | o] ; 
define yetI i -> 0 || ppMarker yetPP _ rootBM [ i ]; 



define corePurple konCore .o. konI .o. 
riCore .o. riI .o. 
kheCore .o. kheI .o. 
keniCore .o. keniA .o.
etshiteniCore .o. etshiteniA .o.
etshiseniCore .o. etshiseniA .o.
kwaCore .o. kwaI .o. kwaO .o. 
takeCore .o. takeA .o. 
etsheCore .o. 
sheCore .o. sheI .o.
ronwaCore .o. ronwaI .o. ronwaO .o.
rakeCore .o. rakeAI .o.
yaCore .o. yaI .o. yaA .o.
shakoAI .o. shakoE .o. shakoO .o.
shakotiAO .o. shakotiEI .o.
yontateCore .o.
ronwatiAO .o. ronwatiEI .o.
yetCore .o. yetI;


define reWritePurple corePurple ;



# phonological alternations common to all pronominal prefixes
